src/fst/morphology/affixes/adpositions.lexc
!! Pronoun inflection

!! Adpostions in the Moksha language might also inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but ...

!!!!!!!!!!!
!! ADPOSITIONS
!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADPOSITION-TYPES
инголе+Po+Loc:инголе ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
инголи+Po+Lat:инголи ADP_WITH_PX_OR_NOT ;
ингольде+Po+Abl:ингольде ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
ингольге+Po+Prl:ингольг%{АЕ%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

кудонголе+Po+Loc:кудонголе ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
кудонголи+Po+Lat:кудонголи ADP_WITH_PX_OR_NOT ;
кудонгольде+Po+Abl:кудонгольде ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
кудонгольге+Po+Prl:кудонгольг%{АЕ%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

сельминголе+Po+Loc:сельминголе ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
сельминголи+Po+Lat:сельминголи ADP_WITH_PX_OR_NOT ;
сельмингольде+Po+Abl:сельмингольде ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
сельмингольге+Po+Prl:сельмингольг%{АЕ%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;


инкса+Po+Cau:инкс%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
кувалма+v1+Po:кувалма ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
кувалма+v2+Po:къвалма ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
кувалма+v3+Po:къвалмова ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
колга+Po:колга ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
вельде+Po:вельде ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
лаца+Po+Ine:лац%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
мархта+Po:мархт%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
перьфке+Po:перьфк%{АЕ%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
ваксста+Po+Ela:ваксст%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ; !Prl, Ill, Ine, Ela,
ваксс+Po+Ill:ваксс ENDLEX ; !Prl, Ill, Ine, Ela,
ваксс+Po+Ill:ваксоз ADP-WITH-PX ; !Prl, Ill, Ine, Ela,
ваксса+Po+Ine:ваксс%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ; !Prl, Ill, Ine, Ela,
вакска+Po+Prl:вакска ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ; !Prl, Ill, Ine, Ela,

тейста+Po+Ela:тейст%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
тейс+Po+Ill:тейс ENDLEX ;
тейс+Po+Ill:теез ADP-WITH-PX ;
тейса+Po+Ine:тейс%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
тейге+Po+Prl:тейг%{ЕА%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
пяле+Po+Loc:пяле ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
пяли+Po+Lat:пяли K ;
пяльде+Po+Abl:пяльде ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
пяльге+Po+Prl:пяльг%{АЕ%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

перфпяле+Po+Loc:перфпяле ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
перфпяли+Po+Lat:перфпяли K ;
перфпяльде+Po+Abl:перфпяльде ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
перфпяльге+Po+Prl:перфпяльг%{АЕ%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

шире+Po+Loc:шире ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
шири+Po+Lat:шири K ;
ширде+Po+Abl:ширде ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
ширьге+Po+Prl:ширьг%{АЕ%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

томбале+Po+Loc:томбале ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
томбали+Po+Lat:томбали K ;
томбальде+Po+Abl:томбальде ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
томбальге+Po+Prl:томбальг%{АЕ%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
ланга+Po+Prl:ланга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

ала+Po+Loc:ал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
алу+Po+Lat:алу K ;
алда+Po+Abl:алд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
алга+Po+Prl:алга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

вальмала+Po+Loc:вальмал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
вальмалу+Po+Lat:вальмалу K ;
вальмалда+Po+Abl:вальмалд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
вальмалга+Po+Prl:вальмалга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

кавлала+Po+Loc:кавлал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
кавлалу+Po+Lat:кавлалу K ;
кавлалда+Po+Abl:кавлалд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
кавлалга+Po+Prl:кавлалга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

карьала+Po+Loc:карьал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
карьалу+Po+Lat:карьалу K ;
карьалда+Po+Abl:карьалд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
карьалга+Po+Prl:карьалга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

кядьала+Po+Loc:кядьал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
кядьалу+Po+Lat:кядьалу K ;
кядьалда+Po+Abl:кядьалд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
кядьалга+Po+Prl:кядьалга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
!! check for primary
кядяла+Po+Loc:кядял%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
кядялу+Po+Lat:кядялу K ;
кядялда+Po+Abl:кядялд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
кядялга+Po+Prl:кядялга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

латала+Po+Loc:латал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
латалу+Po+Lat:латалу K ;
латалда+Po+Abl:латалд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
латалга+Po+Prl:латалга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

няряла+Po+Loc:нярял%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
нярялу+Po+Lat:нярялу K ;
нярялда+Po+Abl:нярялд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
нярялга+Po+Prl:нярялга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

пацяла+Po+Loc:пацял%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
пацялу+Po+Lat:пацялу K ;
пацялда+Po+Abl:пацялд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
пацялга+Po+Prl:пацялга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

пейала+Po+Loc:пейал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
пейалу+Po+Lat:пейалу K ;
пейалда+Po+Abl:пейалд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
пейалга+Po+Prl:пейалга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

пекала+Po+Loc:пекал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
пекалу+Po+Lat:пекалу K ;
пекалда+Po+Abl:пекалд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
пекалга+Po+Prl:пекалга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

пильгала+Po+Loc:пильгал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
пильгалу+Po+Lat:пильгалу K ;
пильгалда+Po+Abl:пильгалд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
пильгалга+Po+Prl:пильгалга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

пряла+Po+Loc:прял%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
прялу+Po+Lat:прялу K ;
прялда+Po+Abl:прялд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
прялга+Po+Prl:прялга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

седиала+Po+Loc:седиал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
седиалу+Po+Lat:седиалу K ;
седиалда+Po+Abl:седиалд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
седиалга+Po+Prl:седиалга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

седяла+Po+Loc:седял%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
седялу+Po+Lat:седялу K ;
седялда+Po+Abl:седялд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
седялга+Po+Prl:седялга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

сельмала+Po+Loc:сельмал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
сельмалу+Po+Lat:сельмалу K ;
сельмалда+Po+Abl:сельмалд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
сельмалга+Po+Prl:сельмалга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

сельмокунала+Po+Loc:сельмокунал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
сельмокуналу+Po+Lat:сельмокуналу K ;
сельмокуналда+Po+Abl:сельмокуналд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
сельмокуналга+Po+Prl:сельмокуналга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

сельмофтала+Po+Loc:сельмофтал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
сельмофталу+Po+Lat:сельмофталу K ;
сельмофталда+Po+Abl:сельмофталд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
сельмофталга+Po+Prl:сельмофталга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

улала+Po+Loc:улал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
улалу+Po+Lat:улалу K ;
улалда+Po+Abl:улалд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
улалга+Po+Prl:улалга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

фтала+Po+Loc:фтал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
фталу+Po+Lat:фталу K ;
фталда+Po+Abl:фталд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
фталга+Po+Prl:фталга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

шалхкала+Po+Loc:шалхкал%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
шалхкалу+Po+Lat:шалхкалу K ;
шалхкалда+Po+Abl:шалхкалд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
шалхкалга+Po+Prl:шалхкалга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

эзга+Po+Prl:эзга ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
эзда+Po+Abl:эзд%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
эса+Po+Ine:эс%{АО%} ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
эста+Po+Ela:эст%{АО%} ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
эс+Po+Ill:эс ENDLEX ;
эс+Po+Ill:эз ADP-WITH-PX ;

видева+Po:видева ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
келева+Po:келева ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
корява+Po:корява ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
коряс+Po:коря PO-ILL_ ;
пачка+Po:пачка ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;

!кядьса
вельфке+N+Relat:вельфк%{АЕ%} N_PULA ;



LEXICON ADP_AS_SECONDARY_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT !! follow +Ine +Loc +Prl at least
ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT ;
ADP_AS_SECONDARY_HEAD ; !20250825 oblique forms for secondary head
! 2026-02-17 need oblique possessa with secondary head and then point it to
! ADP_AS_SECONDARY_HEAD


LEXICON ADP_WITH_PX_OR_COP_OR_NOT
 ADP_WITH_PX_OR_NOT ;
 DER/COP ;

LEXICON ADP_WITH_PX_OR_NOT
 K ;
 ADP-WITH-PX ;
 
LEXICON ADP-WITH-PX
 OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-VOWEL ;
!%>%{ЕОØ%}н
 OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-NO-VOWEL ;
!%>т, %>ст

!PO-ABL_ PO-DAT-DEF_ PO_ELA PO-INE_ PO-LAT_ PO-LOC_ PO-PRL_ PO-PRL_ЁНГА PO_КВАЛМА
! ============ !
! Postp lexica !
! ============ !


! This contlex allows for relational word which, otherwise, are open
! to extensive declension
LEXICON PO_
: K ;

!LEXICON PO_КВАЛМА
!: K ;
!! Checking 2018-11-10
!+Pron: OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-VOWEL ;
!+Pron: OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-NO-VOWEL ;

LEXICON PO-INE_
+Ine: K_вок ;
! Checking 2018-11-10
+Pron+Ine: OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-VOWEL ;
+Pron+Ine: OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-NO-VOWEL	;

!LEXICON PO-ABL_
!+Abl: K_вок ;
!LEXICON PO-DAT-DEF_
!+Dat+Def: K_вок ;
!LEXICON PO_ELA
!+Ela: K_вок ;
LEXICON PO-ILL_ ! коряс:коря 
+Ill:%>с K_вок ;
+Ill:%>%{ЕОØ%}з OBLIQUECX-PX-osh  ;
!LEXICON PO-LAT_
!+Lat: K_вок ;
!LEXICON PO-LOC_
!+Loc: K_вок ;
!LEXICON PO-PRL_ !!= * @CODE@ ёнга:ёнга
!+Prl: K_вок ;

!LEXICON PO-PRL_ЁНГА !!= * @CODE@ ёнга:ёнга
!+Prl: K_вок ;
!! Checking 2018-11-10
!+Pron+Prl: OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-VOWEL ;
!+Pron+Prl: OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-NO-VOWEL    ;

LEXICON PO-PRL_MEL1GE !!= * @CODE@ мельге:мельг%{АЕ%}
+Prl: K_вок ;
! Checking 2018-11-10
+Prl:%^Е2А OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-VOWEL ;
+Prl:%^Е2А OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-NO-VOWEL    ;



!LEXICON PO-SPAT_
!: K ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
